Utah statutes.
26-1-25.   Principal and branch offices of department.
The principal office of the department shall be in Salt Lake County. The
department may establish branch offices at other places in the state to
furnish comprehensive and effective health programs and to render additional
assistance to local health officials. This section shall not limit the powers
of local health agencies.
